Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1007.16
Basic funding;
calculation.

(1) The department shall calculate
basic funding for each district as provided in this section.

(2) For state aid calculated for school
fiscal years prior to school fiscal year 2011-12:

(a) A comparison group shall
be established for each district consisting of the districts for which basic
funding is being calculated, the five larger districts that are closest in
size to the district for which basic funding is being calculated as measured
by formula students, and the five smaller districts that are closest in size
to the district for which basic funding is being calculated as measured by
formula students. If there are not five districts that are larger than the
district for which basic funding is being calculated or if there are not five
districts that are smaller than the district for which basic funding is being
calculated, the comparison group shall consist of only as many districts as
fit the criteria. If more than one district has exactly the same number of
formula students as the largest or smallest district in the comparison group,
all of the districts with exactly the same number of formula students as the
largest or smallest districts in the comparison group shall be included in
the comparison group. If one or more districts have exactly the same number
of formula students as the district for which basic funding is being calculated,
all such districts shall be included in the comparison group in addition to
the five larger districts and the five smaller districts. The comparison group
shall remain the same for the final calculation of aid pursuant to section
79-1065;

(b) For districts with nine
hundred or more formula students, basic funding shall equal the formula students
multiplied by the average of the adjusted general fund operating expenditures
per formula student for each district in the comparison group, excluding both
the district with the highest adjusted general fund operating expenditures
per formula student and the district with the lowest adjusted general fund
operating expenditures per formula student of the districts in the comparison
group; and

(c) For districts with fewer
than nine hundred formula students, basic funding shall equal the product
of the average of the adjusted general fund operating expenditures for each
district in the comparison group, excluding both the district with the highest
adjusted general fund operating expenditures and the district with the lowest
adjusted general fund operating expenditures of the districts in the comparison
group.

(3) For state
aid calculated for school fiscal year 2011-12 and each school fiscal year
thereafter:

(a) A comparison group shall be established for each district consisting
of the districts for which basic funding is being calculated, the ten larger
districts that are closest in size to the district for which basic funding
is being calculated as measured by formula students, and the ten smaller districts
that are closest in size to the district for which basic funding is being
calculated as measured by formula students. If there are not ten districts
that are larger than the district for which basic funding is being calculated
or if there are not ten districts that are smaller than the district for which
basic funding is being calculated, the comparison group shall consist of only
as many districts as fit the criteria. If more than one district has exactly
the same number of formula students as the largest or smallest district in
the comparison group, all of the districts with exactly the same number of
formula students as the largest or smallest districts in the comparison group
shall be included in the comparison group. If one or more districts have exactly
the same number of formula students as the district for which basic funding
is being calculated, all such districts shall be included in the comparison
group in addition to the ten larger districts and the ten smaller districts.
The comparison group shall remain the same for the final calculation of aid
pursuant to section 79-1065;

(b) For districts with nine hundred or
more formula students, basic funding shall equal the formula students multiplied
by the average of the adjusted general fund operating expenditures per formula
student for each district in the comparison group, excluding both the two
districts with the highest adjusted general fund operating expenditures per
formula student and the two districts with the lowest adjusted general fund
operating expenditures per formula student of the districts in the comparison
group; and

(c) For districts with fewer than nine hundred formula students,
basic funding shall equal the product of the average of the adjusted general
fund operating expenditures for each district in the comparison group, excluding
both the two districts with the highest adjusted general fund operating expenditures
and the two districts with the lowest adjusted general fund operating expenditures
of the districts in the comparison group.

Laws 2008, LB988, § 18;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 29;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 10.